Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1731.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of education; office of Indian education; exemption A. The sum of $2,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of education for the office of Indian education established by section 15-244, Arizona Revised Statutes.  Monies appropriated pursuant to this subsection must be used for personnel and operations of the office of Indian education as prescribed by section 15-244, Arizona Revised Statutes. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.